Missouri, session 2026, SB1180.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 490.715, 537.060, and 537.067, RSMo,
are repealed and fourteen new sections enacted in lieu thereof,
to be known as sections 490.715, 510.500, 510.503, 510.506,
510.509, 510.512, 510.515, 510.518, 510.521, 537.059, 537.060,
537.067, 537.092, and 537.870, to read as follows:
490.715. 1. No evidence of collateral sources, or
payments rendered under subsection 2 of this section, shall
be admissible other than such evidence provided for in this
section.
2. If prior to trial a defendant or his or her insurer
or authorized representative, or any combination of them,
pays all or any part of a plaintiff's special damages, then
any portion of a plaintiff's claims for special damages that
are satisfied by a payment from a defendant or the
defendant's insurer or authorized representative, or any
combination of them, are not recoverable from that defendant.
3. If such payments described in subsection 2 of this
section are included in a plaintiff's claim for special
damages at trial, the defendant who made the payment, or on
whose behalf the payment was made, shall be entitled to
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1180 2
deduct and receive a credit for such payments from any
judgment as provided for in section 490.710.
4. This section does not require the exclusion of
evidence admissible for another proper purpose.
5. (1) Except as provided in subsection 2 of this
section, [parties] in any action where a plaintiff seeks to
recover for personal injury, bodily injury, or death, any
party may introduce evidence of the actual cost of the
medical care or treatment rendered to a plaintiff, or [a
patient whose care is at issue] to the person for whose
injury or death a plaintiff seeks to recover. Actual cost
of the medical care or treatment shall be reasonable,
necessary, and a proximate result of the negligence or fault
of any party.
(2) No party shall introduce evidence of the amount
billed for medical care or treatment rendered to a plaintiff
or a patient whose care is at issue in a plaintiff's case if
the amount billed has been discounted pursuant to any
contract, price reduction, or write-off by any person or
entity or satisfied by payment of an amount less than the
amount billed for that medical care or treatment.
6. The actual cost of medical care or treatment
rendered to a plaintiff or a patient whose care is at issue
in a plaintiff's case and discounts pursuant to any
contract, price reduction, or write-off shall be admissible
evidence relevant to the potential cost of future treatment
of the same type or kind to that plaintiff or patient whose
care is at issue in a plaintiff's case.
7. For purposes of this [subsection] section, the
phrase "actual cost of the medical care or treatment" shall
be defined as a sum of money not to exceed the dollar
amounts paid by or on behalf of a plaintiff, or a patient

SB 1180 3
whose care is at issue in a plaintiff's case, plus any
remaining dollar amount necessary to satisfy the financial
obligation, including valid outstanding liens, for medical
care or treatment by a health care provider after adjustment
for any contractual discounts, price reduction, or write-off
by any person or entity.
510.500. Sections 510.500 to 510.521 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Uniform Interstate Depositions and
Discovery Act".
510.503. As used in sections 510.500 to 510.521, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Foreign jurisdiction", a state other than this
state;
(2) "Foreign subpoena", a subpoena issued under
authority of a court of record of a foreign jurisdiction;
(3) "Person", an individual, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability
company, association, joint venture, public corporation,
government or political subdivision, agency or
instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity;
(4) "State", a state of the United States, the
District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin
Islands, a federally recognized Indian tribe, or any
territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction
of the United States;
(5) "Subpoena", a document, however denominated,
issued under authority of a court of record requiring a
person to:
(a) Attend and give testimony at a deposition;
(b) Produce and permit inspection and copying of
designated books, documents, records, electronically stored

SB 1180 4
information, or tangible items in the possession, custody,
or control of the person; or
(c) Permit inspection of premises under the control of
the person.
510.506. 1. To request issuance of a subpoena under
this section, a party shall submit a foreign subpoena to a
clerk of court in the county in which discovery is sought to
be conducted in this state. A request for the issuance of a
subpoena under sections 510.500 to 510.521 shall not
constitute an appearance in the courts of this state.
2. If a party submits a foreign subpoena to a clerk of
court in this state, the clerk, in accordance with such
court's procedure, shall promptly issue a subpoena for
service upon the person to which the foreign subpoena is
directed.
3. A subpoena under subsection 2 of this section shall:
(1) Incorporate the terms used in the foreign
subpoena; and
(2) Contain or be accompanied by the names, addresses,
and telephone numbers of all counsel of record in the
proceeding to which the subpoena relates and of any party
not represented by counsel.
510.509. A subpoena issued by a clerk of court under
section 510.506 shall be served in compliance with the
Missouri supreme court rules of civil procedure and laws of
this state.
510.512. The Missouri supreme court rules of civil
procedure and laws of this state, and any amendments
thereto, apply to subpoenas issued under section 510.506.
510.515. An application to the court for a protective
order or to enforce, quash, or modify a subpoena issued by a
clerk of court under section 510.506 shall comply with the

SB 1180 5
Missouri supreme court rules of civil procedure and the laws
of this state and be submitted to the court in the county in
which discovery is to be conducted.
510.518. In applying and construing sections 510.500
to 510.521, consideration shall be given to the need to
promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject
matter among states that enact it.
510.521. Sections 510.500 to 510.521 apply to requests
for discovery in cases pending on August 28, 2026.
537.059. In all actions in which there is any count
alleging a tort to recover damages and in which any party
contends that the damages were caused by the alleged fault
of more than one person or entity, the trier of fact shall
determine the amount of fault attributable to each person or
entity, regardless of whether the person or entity is a
party to the action, and regardless of whether the person or
entity has settled or been released from liability. Fault
of another person or entity may be alleged by any party to
the tort action in any claim, counterclaim, cross-claim, or
as an affirmative defense. Any determination by the trier
of fact as to the amount of fault attributable to a person
or entity not a party to the action at the time of trial
shall not be binding against or otherwise affect the rights
or liabilities of that person or entity.
537.060. Defendants in a judgment founded on an action
for the redress of a private wrong shall be subject to
contribution, and all other consequences of such judgment,
in the same manner and to the same extent as defendants in a
judgment in an action founded on contract. When an
agreement by release, covenant not to sue or not to enforce
a judgment is given in good faith to one of two or more
persons liable in tort for the same injury or wrongful

SB 1180 6
death, such agreement shall not discharge any of the other
tort-feasors for the damage unless the terms of the
agreement so provide[; however such agreement shall reduce
the claim by the stipulated amount of the agreement, or in
the amount of consideration paid, whichever is greater. The
agreement shall discharge the tort-feasor to whom it is
given from all liability for contribution or noncontractual
indemnity to any other tort-feasor. The term
"noncontractual indemnity" as used in this section refers to
indemnity between joint tort-feasors culpably negligent,
having no legal relationship to each other and does not
include indemnity which comes about by reason of contract,
or by reason of vicarious liability].
537.067. 1. In all tort actions for damages, if a
defendant is found to bear fifty-one percent or more of
fault, then such defendant shall be jointly and severally
liable for the amount of the judgment rendered against the
defendants less the total of any stipulated amount in any
release, covenant not to sue or not to enforce a judgment
under any agreement with any other person or entity alleged
to have been at fault pursuant to section 537.059, or any
consideration paid by such person or entity, whichever is
greater. If a defendant is found to bear less than fifty-
one percent of fault, then the defendant shall only be
responsible for the percentage of the judgment for which the
defendant is determined to be responsible by the trier of
fact; except that, a party is responsible for the fault of
another defendant or for payment of the proportionate share
of another defendant if any of the following applies:
(1) The other defendant was acting as an employee of
the party;

SB 1180 7
(2) The party's liability for the fault of another
person arises out of a duty created by the federal
Employers' Liability Act, 45 U.S.C. Section 51.
2. The defendants shall only be severally liable for
the percentage of punitive damages for which fault is
attributed to such defendant by the trier of fact.
3. In all tort actions, no party may disclose to the
trier of fact the impact of this section.
537.092. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, in any civil action in which the trier of fact is
a jury, neither a party nor the attorneys of a party shall
seek or make reference to a specific dollar amount or state
a range for the jury to consider with respect to awards for
noneconomic damages, as that term is defined in section
538.205.
537.870. 1. Within thirty days of filing a civil
action involving a latent injury or disease or a claim for
medical monitoring, the claimant shall file a sworn
information form specifying the evidence that provides the
basis for each claim against each defendant. The sworn
information form shall include the following with
specificity:
(1) The claimant's name, date of birth, marital
status, occupation, smoking history, current and past
residences, current and past worksites, current and past
employers, and if applicable, the name of any individual
through whom the claimant alleges exposure to the product or
substance that forms a basis for the civil action;
(2) The name and address of each individual who is
knowledgeable about the exposures or events that form a
basis for the civil action and the individual's relationship
to the claimant;

SB 1180 8
(3) The manufacturer or seller and specific brand and
trade name of each product or substance that forms a basis
for the civil action;
(4) Each site, including the address of each site, and
the specific location at each site where any exposure or
event occurred that form a basis for the civil action;
(5) The beginning and ending dates of each exposure or
event that form a basis for the civil action and the
specific manner, frequency, and duration of each exposure or
event that form a basis for the civil action;
(6) The specific disease or injury that is alleged; and
(7) A certification that all supporting documentation
relating to the information required by this section has
been provided to the parties.
2. A claimant shall supplement the information
required by this section when the claimant receives
information that is required to be disclosed or becomes
aware that a prior disclosure was inaccurate or incomplete.
3. Discovery shall not commence against a defendant
until the defendant's product, substance, or premises is
specifically identified in the disclosures required by this
section.
4. The court, on motion by a defendant, shall dismiss
the civil action without prejudice as to any defendant whose
product, substance, or premises is not specifically
identified in the disclosures required by this section.
5. The court, on motion by a defendant, shall dismiss
the civil action without prejudice as to the moving
defendant or as to all defendants, as applicable, if the
claimant fails to comply in whole or in part with the
provisions of this section.
✓